Washington statutes.
RCW 43.84.130

Separate accounting as to permanent school fund.

For the purposes of RCW 43.84.120 the state treasurer shall make and keep an accounting separation of the amount of cash balances in the state treasury belonging to the permanent school fund.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.84.130. Prior: 1951 c 232 s 1.]